California, session 20252026, SB309.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12306.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:12306.1. (a) When any an increase in provider wages or benefits is locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, or any increase in provider wages or benefits is adopted by ordinance pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, then the county shall use county-only funds to fund both the county share and the state share, including employment taxes, of any increase in the cost of the program, unless otherwise provided for in the annual Budget Act or appropriated by statute. No increase in wages or benefits locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance pursuant to this section, and no increase in the public authority administrative rate, shall take effect unless and until, prior to its implementation, the increase is reviewed and determined to be in compliance with state law and the department has obtained the approval of the State Department of Health Care Services for the increase pursuant to a determination that it is consistent with federal law and to ensure federal financial participation for the services under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and unless and until all of the following conditions have been met:(1) Each county has provided the department with documentation of the approval of the county board of supervisors of the proposed public authority or nonprofit consortium rate, including wages and related expenditures. The documentation shall be received by the department before the department and the State Department of Health Care Services may approve the rate increase.(2) Each county has met department guidelines and regulatory requirements as a condition of receiving state participation in the rate.(b) Any rate approved pursuant to subdivision (a) shall take effect commencing on the first day of the month subsequent to the month in which final approval is received from the department. The department may grant approval on a conditional basis, subject to the availability of funding.(c) The state shall pay 65 percent, and each county shall pay 35 percent, of the nonfederal share of wage and benefit increases pursuant to subdivision (a) and associated employment taxes, only in accordance with subdivision (d).(d) (1) The state shall participate in a total of wages and individual health benefits up to twelve dollars and ten cents ($12.10) per hour until the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code reaches twelve dollars ($12) per hour at which point the state shall participate as provided in paragraph (2).(2) For any increase in wages or individual health benefits locally negotiated, mediated, or imposed by a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium, and the rate increase is approved by the department, or any increase in provider wages or benefits adopted by ordinance pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the state shall participate as provided in subdivision (c) in a total of wages and individual health benefits up to one dollar and ten cents ($1.10) per hour above the amount per hour specified for the corresponding year in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, subdivision (c) of, and subdivision (d) of, Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.(3) (A) For a county that is at or above twelve dollars and ten cents ($12.10) per hour in combined wages and individual health benefits, the state shall participate as provided in subdivision (c) in a cumulative total of up to 10 percent within a three-year period in the sum of the combined total of changes in wages or individual health benefits, or both.(B) The state shall participate as provided in subparagraph (A) for no more than two three-year periods that commence prior to the date that the minimum wage reaches the amount specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, and no more than two three-year periods that commence on or after the date that the minimum wage reaches the amount specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, after which point the county shall pay the entire nonfederal share of any future increases in wages and individual health benefits that exceed the amount specified in paragraphs (1) and (2).(C) A three-year period is defined as three consecutive years. A new three-year period can only begin after the last year of the previous three-year period.(4) Paragraphs (2) and (3) do not apply to contracts executed, or to increases in wages or individual health benefits, locally negotiated, mediated, imposed, or adopted by ordinance, prior to July 1, 2017.